Connecticut, session 2026, SB00312.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) The Department of
Education shall establish an American Sign Language education
working group which shall consist of (1) a representative from each of
the following: The Departments of Education and Aging and Disability
Services, the Labor Department, the Office of Higher Education, the
Connecticut Council of Language Teachers, the American School for the
Deaf and the Connecticut Association of the Deaf, and (2) at least one
American Sign Language instructor who teaches in a public school in
the state.
(b) The working group shall provide recommendations to the
Department of Education regarding the following:
(1) Curriculum guidance for American Sign Language instruction
that includes, but is not limited to, aligning such curriculum with
nationally recognized proficiency frameworks;
(2) Teacher certification standards based on standards established by
the American Sign Language Teachers Association and the American
Sign Language Proficiency Interview that includes, but is not limited to,
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 312
(A) establishment of a proficiency benchmark, (B) recognition of an
alternative certification pathway for native American Sign Language
users and interpreters, and (C) reciprocity with American Sign
Language teaching certifications from other states; and
(3) Guidance to educator preparation programs in the state
concerning, but not limited to, the (A) expansion of American Sign
Language and interpretation education programs, (B) creation of
educational incentives, such as tuition support, credit enhancement or
alternative route programs, and (C) establishment of bridge,
endorsement or alternative programs for native American Sign
Language users and certified interpreters seeking teacher certification.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Education shall submit a progress report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to education concerning the work of the American Sign
Language education working group.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than July 1, 2030, the
Department of Education shall issue to each local and regional board of
education the guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (1) of
subsection (b) of section 1 of this act to ensure consistent
implementation of the American Sign Language portion of the world
languages curriculum required pursuant to section 10-16b of the general
statutes.
Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 10-183t of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) (1) On and after July 1, 2022, the board shall pay a subsidy of two
hundred twenty dollars, to the board of education or to the state, if
applicable, on behalf of any member who is receiving retirement
benefits or a disability allowance from the system, the spouse of such
member, the surviving spouse of such member, or a disabled dependent
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 312
of such member if there is no spouse or surviving spouse, who is
participating in a health insurance plan maintained by a board of
education or by the state, if applicable. Such payment shall not exceed
the actual cost of such insurance.
(2) With respect to any person participating in any such plan
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the state shall appropriate to
the board one-third of the cost of the subsidy, except that, for the fiscal
years ending June 30, 2013, and June 30, 2026, the state shall appropriate
twenty-five per cent of the cost of the subsidy. On and after July 1, 2018,
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2019, and for each fiscal year
thereafter, fifty per cent of the total amount appropriated by the state in
each such fiscal year for the state's share of the cost of such subsidies
shall be paid to the board on or before July first of such fiscal year, and
the remaining fifty per cent of such total amount shall be paid to the
board on or before December first of such fiscal year.
(3) No payment to a board of education pursuant to this subsection
may be used to reduce the amount of any premium payment on behalf
of any such member, spouse, surviving spouse, or disabled dependent,
made by such board pursuant to any agreement in effect on July 1, 1990.
On and after July 1, 2022, the board shall pay a subsidy of four hundred
forty dollars per month on behalf of the member, spouse or the
surviving spouse of such member who: (A) Has attained the normal
retirement age to participate in Medicare, (B) is not eligible for Medicare
Part A without cost, and (C) contributes at least four hundred forty
dollars per month towards his or her medical and prescription drug
plan provided by the board of education.
(4) On and after July 1, 2026, the board shall pay a subsidy of four
hundred forty dollars per month to the board of education on behalf of
any member, spouse or the surviving spouse of such member who is
receiving a disability allowance from the system and participating in the
group health insurance plan maintained by such member's last
employing board of education, as defined in subsection (b) of this
section, in lieu of the subsidy amount specified for such member, spouse
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 312
or surviving spouse pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10-183t(c)
ED Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
LCO 4 of 4